Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 21 Voting by Armed Forces [Repealed.]

17-21-1 — 17-21-43.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1470, §§ 1-31; P.L. 1946, ch. 1776, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3502, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

17-21-1

— 17-21-43; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 201, § 8; P.L. 1963, ch. 73, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-21-1

2; P.L. 1963, ch. 73, § 2; P.L. 1964, ch. 103, § 2; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, §§ 19-21; P.L. 1968, ch. 106, § 2; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 11; Repealed by P.L. 1963, ch. 73, § 3; P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 1. For present provisions on mail ballots, see §

17-20-1

et seq; for provisions on registration and voting in federal elections by citizens residing outside the United States, see §

17-21.1-1

et seq.